Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-214] Disclosure; limitations.
If a long-term care insurance policy or certificate contains any limitations
with respect to preexisting conditions, the limitations shall appear as a
separate paragraph of the policy or certificate and shall be labeled as
"Preexisting Condition Limitations". [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next